Louisiana, session 2026, HB229.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3140 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3140. Prohibition on the use of public funds for certain postsecondary degree
programs
A.(1) No public postsecondary education management board shall allocate
state funds to low-earning outcome programs of study. An allocation includes but
is not limited to the following:
(a) Individual student financial aid.
(b) Base operational or instructional funding.
(c) Separately or specially appropriated aid or grants.
(d) Capital or facilities funding.
(2) No political subdivision shall allocate or expend local public funds on
low-earning outcome programs of study.
B. The Board of Regents shall do the following:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-451 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 229
(1) Annually review federal determinations of what constitutes a low-earning
outcome program and update rules in accordance with Subsection E of this Section
accordingly.
(2) Submit an annual report to the legislature that includes the following:
(a) A list of programs prohibited from receiving state aid.
(b) Enforcement of such prohibitions.
(c) The estimated fiscal impact resulting from the prohibitions.
C. This Section shall not prohibit funds from being allocated for the purpose
of implementing general studies programs in order to allow a student to pursue a
general studies major if the student pursues a concentration in a program of study
that is not a low-earning outcome program of study.
D. For purposes of this Section, "low-earning outcome program of study"
means an educational program designated as a low-earning outcome program
pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 1087d(c).
E. The Board of Regents shall promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act as necessary for the implementation of this Section.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be initially implemented prior to the
summer semester of the 2027-2028 school year.